Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 6. Penalties.

Collateral references. —

55 C.J.S., Marriage, §§ 29, 32, 37-41, 47.

Sec. 25.05.331.
Unlawful issuance or refusal of license.

A licensing officer who knowingly issues a marriage license knowing it to be in violation of the provisions of this chapter or who wilfully and wrongfully refuses to issue a license is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by a fine of not more than $500, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.341.
Misrepresentation.

A person who misrepresents a fact required to be stated on the application for a license or a form related to it, or a licensing officer who issues a marriage license having reason to believe that any material fact has been misrepresented, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $500.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 134 SLA 1984)

Sec. 25.05.351.
Violation concerning marriage license application.

A licensing officer who refuses or neglects to keep a complete record of each application and of each marriage license issued, or who fails to keep marriage license applications open for inspection or examination by the public during office hours is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $50. Each failure, neglect, or refusal constitutes a separate offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 4 ch 28 SLA 1975; am § 10 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Sec. 25.05.361.
Unlawful solemnization of marriage.

A person who solemnizes a marriage without first receiving a proper marriage license from the parties as provided in this chapter or without the parties declaring to take each other as husband and wife, or without requiring the presence of two competent witnesses; or who solemnizes a marriage involving a person under the legal age of marriage without the consent of (1) the licensing official when authorized, or (2) the parents or guardian of the underaged person, being stated in the license; or who solemnizes a marriage knowing of any legal impediment thereto, or who solemnizes a marriage after the expiration of the license, or who falsely certifies to the date of a marriage solemnized by that person is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by a fine of not more than $500, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.371.
Solemnization of marriage by unauthorized person.

A person not authorized by this chapter who wilfully or knowingly undertakes to solemnize a marriage in this state is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Cross references. —

For effect of solemnization by unauthorized person on validity of marriage, see AS

25.05.281

.

Collateral references. —

Validity of marriage as affected by lack of legal authority of person solemnizing it, 13 ALR4th 1323.